Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-220
Oil and gas leases; sale at public auction; notice.

No such lease shall be sold except at public auction and after notice of the time and place of such sale, by publication two consecutive weeks in a legal newspaper published in the county where the land to be leased is situated and such other notice, if any, as the governing board may require. If no legal newspaper is published in the county where the land is situated said notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation therein. The purchaser of any such lease shall pay the cost of publishing the notice required hereunder.

Laws 1943, c. 163, § 3, p. 578;

R.S.1943, § 57-220.